Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201673-605
Act; applicability.

The Transparency
in Government Procurement Act applies only to contracts awarded by the Department
of Administrative Services on and after July 1, 2014, and does not apply to
the Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission.

Laws 2014, LB371, § 5.